Utah statutes.
17C-1-701.   Approval of agency deactivation and dissolution -- Restrictions -- Notice -- Recording requirements -- Agency records -- Dissolution expenses.

(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), the legislative body of the community that created an agency may, by ordinance, approve the deactivation and dissolution of the agency.

(b)  An ordinance under Subsection (1)(a) approving the deactivation and dissolution of an agency may not be adopted unless the agency has no outstanding bonded indebtedness, other unpaid loans, indebtedness, or advances, and no legally binding contractual obligations with persons or entities other than the community.

(2) (a)  The community legislative body shall:

(i)  within 10 days after adopting an ordinance under Subsection (1), file with the lieutenant governor a copy of a notice of an impending boundary action, as defined in Section 67-1a-6.5, that meets the requirements of Subsection 67-1a-6.5(3); and

(ii)  upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of a certificate of dissolution under Section 67-1a-6.5, submit to the recorder of the county in which the agency is located:

(A)  the original notice of an impending boundary action;

(B)  the original certificate of dissolution; and

(C)  a certified copy of the ordinance approving the deactivation and dissolution of the agency.

(b)  Upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of the certificate of dissolution under Section 67-1a-6.5, the agency is dissolved.

(c)  Within 10 days after receiving the certificate of dissolution from the lieutenant governor under Section 67-1a-6.5, the community legislative body shall send a copy of the certificate of dissolution and the ordinance adopted under Subsection (1) to the State Board of Education, and each taxing entity.

(d)  The community legislative body shall publish a notice of dissolution in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the dissolved agency is located.

(3)  The books, documents, records, papers, and seal of each dissolved agency shall be deposited for safekeeping and reference with the recorder of the community that dissolved the agency.

(4)  The agency shall pay all expenses of the deactivation and dissolution.



Amended by Chapter 350, 2009 General Session

